suomimalaga/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
LEXICON Sukija_p
[Lp]ajoasu:ajoasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]esiintymisasu:esiintymisasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]juhla-asu:juhla-asu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kieliasu:kieliasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kirjoitusasu:kirjoitusasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]naamiaisasu:naamiaisasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]palvelusasu:palvelusasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]peliasu:peliasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]pyöräilyasu:pyöräilyasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]työasu:työasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uima-asu:uima-asu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ulkoiluasu:ulkoiluasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]urheiluasu:urheiluasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vappuasu:vappuasu EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
!!
[Lp]alaston:alaston EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]halpa:halpa EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]hulluin:hulluin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]hyvin:hyvin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]jehovan:jehovan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kaakkois:kaakkois EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kahdeksan:kahdeksan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kahtais:kahtais EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kaksi:kaksi EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kapea:kapea EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]karaiitti:karaiitti EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]karkea:karkea EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kashmir:kashmir EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kaunis:kaunis EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kevyt:kevyt EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kiinteä:kiinteä EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kokoon:kokoon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]koraanin:koraanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]laaja:laaja EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]leveä:leveä EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]loppuun:loppuun EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]lyhyt:lyhyt EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]maahan:maahan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]marjo:marjo EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]miljoona:miljoona EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]minkä:minkä EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ohitse:ohitse EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]olemassa:olemassa EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]orientaali:orientaali EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]pehmyt:pehmyt EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]piki:piki EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]populaari:populaari EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]populääri:populääri EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]primaari:primaari EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]primääri:primääri EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]puolitoista:puolitoista EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ristiin:ristiin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sisäänpäin:sisäänpäin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sisään:sisään EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
!! [Lp]sub:sub EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]taakse:taakse EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]takaisin:takaisin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]terävä:terävä EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]trans:trans EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tuhat:tuhat EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tumma:tumma EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tuore:tuore EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ulkois:ulkois EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ulospäin:ulospäin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ultrakevyt:ultrakevyt EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudelleen:uudelleen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudestaan:uudestaan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudesti:uudesti EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vaalean:vaalean EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vaalea:vaalea EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]valko:valko EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vallas:vallas EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]valmis:valmis EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vihertävän:vihertävän EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]viisi:viisi EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vinottais:vinottais EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vuotis:vuotis EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vähittäis:vähittäis EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]yksi:yksi EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]äärimmäis:äärimmäis EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
!!
[Lp]aasian:aasian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]abessinian:abessinian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]afganistanin:afganistanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]afrikan:afrikan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]afrikka:afrikka EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ahvenanmaan:ahvenanmaan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]alaskan:alaskan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]amazonin:amazonin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]amerikan:amerikan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]amerikka:amerikka EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]anatolian:anatolian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]andalusian:andalusian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]andien:andien EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]angolan:angolan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]anonyymi:anonyymi EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]argentiinan:argentiinan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]australian:australian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]bahian:bahian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]balin:balin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]balkanin:balkanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]belgian:belgian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]belizen:belizen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]berliinin:berliinin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]bernin:bernin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]bolivian:bolivian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]borneon:borneon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]bostonin:bostonin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]brasilian:brasilian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]bretagnen:bretagnen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]britannian:britannian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]chilen:chilen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]coloradon:coloradon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]darwinin:darwinin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ecuadorin:ecuadorin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]egyptin:egyptin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]englannin:englannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]etiopian:etiopian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]euroopan:euroopan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]eurooppa:eurooppa EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ex-[Bm]:ex- EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnH;
[Lp]filippiinien:filippiinien EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]flanderin:flanderin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]floridan:floridan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]formosan:formosan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]färsaarten:färsaarten EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]gabonin:gabonin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]galapagosin:galapagosin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]gotlannin:gotlannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]grönlannin:grönlannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]haitin:haitin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]hannoverin:hannoverin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]havaijin:havaijin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]helsinki:helsinki EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]helsingin:helsingin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]himalajan:himalajan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]hondurasin:hondurasin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]iberian:iberian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]intian:intian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]irlannin:irlannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]jaavan:jaavan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]jamaikan:jamaikan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]japanin:japanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]jugoslavian:jugoslavian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kalaharin:kalaharin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kalifornian:kalifornian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kamerunin:kamerunin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kanadan:kanadan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kanarian:kanarian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kapverden:kapverden EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]karibian:karibian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]karpaattien:karpaattien EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kashmirin:kashmirin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]katalonian:katalonian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kaukasian:kaukasian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kenian:kenian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kolumbian:kolumbian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kongon:kongon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kuuban:kuuban EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]kyproksen:kyproksen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]laatokan:laatokan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]libanonin:libanonin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]libyan:libyan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]madagaskarin:madagaskarin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]malesian:malesian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]mantsurian:mantsurian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]mariaanien:mariaanien EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]marshallin:marshallin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]meksikon:meksikon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]molukkien:molukkien EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]mongolian:mongolian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]namibian:namibian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]navarran:navarran EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]nigerian:nigerian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]nightingalen:nightingalen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]niilin:niilin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]nubian:nubian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]orinocon:orinocon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]pakistanin:pakistanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]panaman:panaman EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]papuan:papuan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]patagonian:patagonian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]pietarin:pietarin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]polynesian:polynesian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]puertoricon:puertoricon EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]pyreneiden:pyreneiden EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]pyreneitten:pyreneitten EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]rhodesian:rhodesian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ruijan:ruijan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sardinian:sardinian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sancristobalin:sancristobalin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]senegalin:senegalin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]seychellien:seychellien EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]siamin:siamin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]singaporen:singaporen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]siperian:siperian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]skotlannin:skotlannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]somalian:somalian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]srilankan:srilankan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sulawesin:sulawesin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sumatran:sumatran EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]sveitsin:sveitsin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]syyria:syyria EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tahitin:tahitin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]taiwanin:taiwanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tanimbarin:tanimbarin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tasmanian:tasmanian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]teksasin:teksasin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]transvaalin:transvaalin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tyynenmeren:tyynenmeren EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ugandan:ugandan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenenglannin:uudenenglannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenguinean:uudenguinean EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenirlannin:uudenirlannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenkaledonian:uudenkaledonian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenseelannin:uudenseelannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]walesin:walesin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]venezuelan:venezuelan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]virginian:virginian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]äänisniemen:äänisniemen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]öölannin:öölannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;


LEXICON SukijaLukusananErikoisjälkiliite
[Bc][Ll][Xp]kohtauksinen[X]kohtauksi:kohtauksi LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]käyttöinen[X]käyttöi:käyttöi       LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_ä ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]nopeuksinen[X]nopeuksi:nopeuksi    LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]paisuntainen[X]paisuntai:paisuntai LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]siirtoinen[X]siirtoi:siirtoi       LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]valintainen[X]valintai:valintai    LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]vivahduksinen[X]vivahduksi:vivahduksi LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;


LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_em
[Lem][Xp]Suomi-neiti[X]suomi-[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]den:suomi-neiden Loppu ;
